Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1711
Violations; penalty.

Any livestock dealer who violates any of the provisions of sections 54-1701 to 54-1711 or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, or any order of the department after such order has become final or upon termination of any review proceeding where the order has been sustained by a court of law, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1969, c. 447, § 11, p. 1498;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 46.